hyphenation.dic
.ta1ga1si.

.si1du1sid.
.kul1mu1de.
.kul1ler3kup1pu1de.
.uh1ku1se3asi.
.sel1le.
.uudis3hi1mu3li1kult.
.joonis2ta1ma.
.õle1kar1va.
.juh1tus.
.ul1jalt.
.krii1di3mees.
.äkit1selt.
.hoo1li3kalt.
.tüd1ruk.
.ki1vi3sil1lu1tis.
.kat1su1des.
.pa1la3kast.
.udu1seks.
.vär1vi.
.joo1nis1tu1se.
.li1bi1se1sid.
.proo1vi3des.
.hii1li3sid.
.puh1tast.
.hom1mi1kuks.
.ime1kom1bel.
.pais1tis.
.igat1su1sed.
.pa1ne1vad.

.ki1vi1kõr1best.
.mä1le2ta1nud1ki.
.esi1me1si.
.ku1ning3rii1gi.
.va1nim.
.kõr1be1ga.
.aeg1la1selt.
.nõi1du1sest.
.rüüt1li3väl1ja3õp1pe.
.lap1se3põl1vest.
.väi1kes1te.
.ele1van1di1luust.
.lo1het.
.val1vu1ri1te1ga.
.nõud1nud.
.sa1mu1ti.
.tu1le1va1ne.
.oma1dus1test.
.nel1ja3teist3küm1ne.
.jä1rel.
.ra1ja1da.
.hei1de1tud.
.loo1dus3lik1ku.
.sõl1tu1sid.
.eri1ne1va1mat.
.va1lit1se1jad.
.hir1mu1ära1ta1vaid.
.eel1ar1ve.
.juur1de.
.ta1ga1si3hoid1li1ku1mat.
.ta1sa3selt.
.hea1taht1li1ku.
.loo1mu3li1kult.
.ooda1tes.
.sõ1ja3rat1su1de.
.met1sa3sü1ga1vus1tes.
.print3ses1si.
.ole1ma.
.so1sis1ta1ti.
.seik1lu1si.

.leid1ma.
.ru1ma2lu1seks.
.loo1dus2li1ku.
.pääs1ta.
.rik1ka1mat.
.asu1sid.
.võ1su2ke1sed.
.sõl1tus.
.aka1dee1mia2tes1se.
.vürs1ti2rii1ki1de.
.tin1gi1mu1sed.
.suu1res1ti.
.tor1ni.

.sel1les.
.poe1gi.
.nai1seks.
.eri1ne1valt.
.tõe2näo1su1se1ga.
.pä1ris2osaks.
.mõt1tes.
.kau1ge1mas1se.

.sel1le1le.
.jä1rel2mak1su2või1ma1lu1se1ga.
.tu1ge1vus.
.pol1nud.
.saa1da.
.ise1ene1sest2mõis1ta.
.mõõ1du1kalt.
.sü1dant2soo1jen1da1va1maid.
.te1da.
.lu1ge1da.
.jäe1ta.

.lii1ga.
.päi1ke1se2lõõ1sas.
.pä1rast.
.teist2su1gu1ne.
.los1si2vä1ra1vast.
.ma1ga1ma2jää1mist.
.kii1rus2ta1des.
.ma1ga1des.
.tõt1tu.
.väi1ke1se.
.ui1nus.

.vä1ra1vad.
.kel1le1gi.
.ise1sei1sev.
.sil1ma2de1le.
.ro1hu1ga.
